North Carolina, session 2025, HB949.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 14-269.2(g) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(8) A sworn law enforcement officer who is hired as an armed security guard by
a nonpublic school operating under Part I or II of Article 39 of Chapter 115C
of the General Statutes, provided that the officer is acting in the discharge of
the officer's official duties on the premises of that school. For purposes of this
subdivision, a sworn law enforcement officer shall include a sworn law
enforcement officer certified under Chapter 17C or 17E of the General
Statutes, a company police officer commissioned under Chapter 74E of the
General Statutes, or a campus police officer commissioned under Chapter 74G
of the General Statutes."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
*H949-v-1*